Wisconsin, session 2025, SB7.
do enact as follows:SB7,1Section 1. 32.015 of the statutes is renumbered 32.015 (1).SB7,2Section 2. 32.015 (2) of the statutes is created to read:32.015 (2) Property may not be acquired by condemnation for the purpose of developing or facilitating the operation of any of the following:(a) A wind energy facility.(b) A solar energy facility.SB7,3Section 3. 710.01 of the statutes is amended to read:710.01 Aliens may acquire lands. Subject to the limitations of s. ss. 710.02 and 710.04, an alien may acquire and hold lands or any right thereto or interest therein by purchase, devise, or descent, and the alien may convey, mortgage, and devise the same; and if the alien shall die intestate the same shall descend to the alien’s heirs; and in all cases such lands shall be held, conveyed, mortgaged, or devised or shall descend in like manner and with like effect as if such alien were a native citizen of the state or of the United States.SB7,4Section 4. 710.04 of the statutes is created to read:710.04 Prohibition on foreign adversary ownership of real property. (1) Definitions. In this section:(a) “Entity” means a corporation, limited liability company, partnership, association, or other organization or enterprise.(b) 1. “Foreign adversary” means the countries of the People’s Republic of China, including the Hong Kong Special Administrative Region and the Macau Special Administrative Region; the Republic of Cuba; the Islamic Republic of Iran; the Democratic People’s Republic of Korea; the Russian Federation; and Venezuela under the regime of Nicolás Maduro.2. “Foreign adversary” does not include any country, government, regime, or person specified under subd. 1. if the country, government, regime, or person is not included in the list of foreign adversaries under 15 CFR 791.4, as amended from time to time.(c) “Foreign principal” means any of the following:1. The government or an official of the government of a foreign adversary.2. An individual who is a citizen of a foreign adversary, is not a lawful permanent resident of the United States, and does not hold a valid, unexpired visa issued by the federal department of state that authorizes the individual to be legally present in this state.3. A business entity that is organized under the laws of a foreign adversary and that does not have its principal place of business in the United States.4. An investment fund that is owned or controlled by a foreign adversary or agent of a foreign adversary.5. An entity that has 50 percent or more of its stock, securities, or other indicia of ownership owned or controlled, directly or indirectly, by a person or combination of persons described in subds. 1. to 4.6. An agent of a person described in subds. 1. to 5.(2) Prohibition. A foreign principal may not acquire, own, or hold any interest, directly or indirectly, in real property in this state.(3) Divestiture. If a person is determined to be a foreign principal after the effective date of this subsection .... [LRB inserts date], the person shall divest itself of any interests in real property in this state owned or held in violation of sub. (2) no later than 180 days after the date on which the person is determined to be a foreign principal.(4) Forfeitures. Any interest in real property acquired, owned, or held in violation of this section is forfeited to the state.(5) Applicability. This section applies to interests in real property acquired on or after the effective date of this subsection .... [LRB inserts date]. No interest acquired before the effective date of this subsection .... [LRB inserts date], is subject to divestiture or forfeiture under this section. Down Down /2025/related/vetoedinfull/sb7 true vetoedenrolledbills /2025/related/vetoedinfull/sb7 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/SB7 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/SB7 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Vetoed in Full»SB7: Text as Enrolled × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting